Hawaii statutes.
§202-4 Duties of chairperson and executive
director. The chairperson of the workforce development council or the
executive director, at the direction of the council shall:

(1) Serve as consultant to the governor on issues
relating to workforce development and its relation to economic development and
diversification;

(2) Assist in coordinating the programs of all
agencies dealing with issues of concern to the council;

(3) Arrange for statewide studies of the issues
referred to in this chapter;

(4) Secure data and information from agencies
concerned with the issues referred to in this chapter;

(5) Arrange for the exchange of information, plans,
and programs between public and private groups interested in the issues
referred to in this chapter;

(6) Prepare articles, reports, and bulletins for the
use of the council, concerned agencies, and for general publication;

(7) Keep and maintain records and reports and handle
correspondence relative to the work of the council;

(8) Develop recommendations and plans for action
consistent with the purpose of this chapter; and

(9) Assist in carrying out the duties described in
section 202-2. [L 1965, c 270, §5; Supp, §98W-5; HRS §202-4; am L 1985, c 252,
§5; am L 1997, c 346, §5; am L 2016, c 57, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next